Utah statutes.
78B-6-136.   Final decree of adoption -- Agreement by adoptive parent or parents.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), before the court enters a final decree of adoption:

(a)  the adoptive parent or parents and the child being adopted shall appear before the appropriate court; and

(b)  the adoptive parent or parents shall execute an agreement stating that the child shall be adopted and treated in all respects as the adoptive parent's or parents' own lawful child.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection 78B-6-115(4), a court may waive the requirement  described in Subsection (1)(a) if:

(a)  the adoption is not contested;

(b)  the adoptive parent or parents:

(i)  execute an agreement stating that the child shall be adopted and treated in all respects as the parent's or parents' own lawful child;

(ii)  have the agreement described in Subsection (2)(b)(i) notarized; and

(iii)  file the agreement described in Subsection (2)(b)(i) with the court; and

(c)  all requirements of this chapter to obtain a final decree of adoption are otherwise complied with.

